District of Columbia statutes.
6-217

Drug and alcohol testing of Authority employees.

(a)

The Authority may establish a program of, and issue rules for, conducting pre-employment, random, reasonable suspicion, post-accident, return to duty, and follow-up testing for the use of a controlled substance in violation of law or regulation, and testing for alcohol, for Authority employees and candidates for employment with the Authority. Only employees whose duties include responsibility for safety-sensitive or high-risk potential functions may be subject to random testing.

(b)

In prescribing rules under the testing program required by this section, the Authority may require the suspension or termination of an Authority employee when a test indicates that the employee has used a controlled substance or alcohol in violation of Authority rules.

(c)

With regard to employees who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement, the drug and alcohol testing program and rules shall be made applicable to such employees only by agreement between the collective bargaining representative and the Authority.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 18, 47 DCR 1325

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.